Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-149
Aircraft fuel tax; collection; violation; penalty.

The suppliers, distributors, wholesalers, and importers defined in Chapter 66, article 4, shall collect the tax as prescribed in section 3-148, keep an account thereof separately from other fuel tax, and remit the tax collected accordingly to the Tax Commissioner. The Tax Commissioner shall remit the tax to the State Treasurer in the same manner as is provided by law for the collection and remittance of motor vehicle fuel tax. No other or different tax shall be imposed for fuel bought for and used in aircraft. Such tax shall be used for the purposes set forth in the State Aeronautics Act. The penalty for violation of the provisions of this section relating to the collection and remittance of the tax shall be the same as set forth for the violation of the law with reference to the motor fuel tax contained in Chapter 66, article 7, and the right of enforcement and the penalties shall be likewise applicable as set forth therein.

Laws 1945, c. 5, § 14, p. 100;

Laws 1985, LB 272, § 2;

Laws 1991, LB 627, § 2;

Laws 1992, LB 1013, § 2;

Laws 1994, LB 1160, § 48;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 42.